Tennessee, session 114, HB1573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (19).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-249(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Department of disability and aging, created by Section 4-3-101 and Section 4-
3-2701;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1573
010071
- 1 -